Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-1640
Petition; filing; contents.

(1) When a petition is filed with the county clerk signed by persons owning not less than twenty-five percent of the area in the proposed district requesting the formation of a district, the board of the county in which the proposed district is located shall prepare and propose the resolution as provided in section 39-1639.

(2) Any such petition shall state the improvements desired and the property to be included in the district.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 3, p. 681;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 52.
July 18, 2026